Alabama, session 2026rs, SB258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 29-1-2.3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§29-1-2.3
(a) The Alabama Senate shall consist of 35 members.
Each member elected shall reside in the district which he or
she represents or seeks to represent. The State of Alabama is
divided into 35 Senate Districts as provided in subsection
(b).
(b) The numbers and boundaries of the districts are
designated and established by the map prepared by the
Page 1

designated and established by the map prepared by the
SB258 INTRODUCED
Permanent Legislative Committee on Reapportionment and
identified and labeled as McClendon Senate Plan 1 Hatcher
Senate Plan 1-2026, including the corresponding boundary
description provided by the census tracts, blocks, and
counties, and are incorporated by reference as part of this
section.
(c) The Legislature shall post for viewing on its
public website the map referenced in subsection (b), including
the corresponding boundary description provided by the census
tracts, blocks, and counties, and any alternative map,
including the corresponding boundary description provided by
the census tracts, blocks, and counties, introduced by any
member of the Legislature during the legislative session in
which this section is added or amended.
(d) Upon enactment of Act 2021-558, addingthe act
amending this section and adopting the map identified in
subsection (b), the Secretary of the Senate shall transmit the
map and the corresponding boundary description provided by the
census tracts, blocks, and counties identified in subsection
(b) for certification and posting on the public website of the
Secretary of State.
(e) The boundary descriptions provided by the certified
map referenced in subsection (b) shall prevail over the
boundary descriptions provided by the census tracts, blocks,
and counties generated for the map."
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2